Massachusetts, session 194th, H4290.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. There shall be a municipal trust to be known as the Chatham Housing Trust. 
The purpose of the trust is to provide for the creation and preservation of both affordable and 
attainable housing in Chatham for the benefit of year-round residents of the town. For purposes 
of this act, “affordable housing” is defined as housing developments that meet the needs of 
households with incomes up to 100 per cent area median household income as most recently 
determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, adjusted for 
household size and “attainable housing” is defined as housing developments that meet the needs 
of households with incomes up to 200 per cent of the area median household income as most 
recently determined by the United State Department of Housing and Urban Development, 
adjusted for household size. 

of 9 11  SECTION 2. (a) The trust shall be managed by a 7-member board of trustees appointed 
by the select board which board of trustees, upon appointment, shall take the place of, and 
assume the statutory powers and duties of, the Chatham Affordable Housing Trust board of 
trustees created and appointed pursuant to the provisions of Section 55C of Chapter 44 of the 
General Laws. In selecting members of the board of trustees, the select board shall: 
(i) designate 2 of its members to serve on the board of trustees; 
(ii) appoint 1 member of the Chatham Community Housing Partnership to serve on the 
board of trustees; and 
(iii) appoint the remaining 4 members to the board of trustees from the community at 
large, considering a broad range of expertise, including education and experience in real estate 
development and financing. 
(b) Members of the board of trustees shall be sworn to the faithful performance of their 
official duties. A majority of the 7 members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any 
business. The board of trustees shall elect from among its members a chairman, vice-chairman, 
clerk, and such other officers as it shall deem necessary, and shall determine their respective 
duties. 
(c) The original members of the board of trustees shall be appointed within 60 days 
following the effective date of this act. The term of each appointment shall be established by the 
select board or pursuant to a bylaw adopted hereunder. In the event of a vacancy on the board of 
trustees, a successor member shall be appointed to complete the unexpired term. 

of 9 31  (d) Any member of the board of trustees may be removed by the select board for cause 
after reasonable notice and a public hearing by the select board unless such notice and hearing 
are expressly waived in writing by the member subject to removal. 
(e) The members of the board of trustees shall not receive compensation for the 
performance of their duties, but each member shall be reimbursed by the trust for expenses 
incurred in the performance of the member's duties. 
SECTION 3. (a) There shall be established a trust fund to be known as the Housing Trust 
Fund. The fund shall be separate and apart from the General Fund and the Affordable Housing 
Trust Fund of the town of Chatham. 
(b) The town treasurer shall be the custodian of the trust fund. 
(c) The trust fund shall receive and hold all gifts and grants made to the trust fund as well 
as money appropriated by the town to the trust. The trust fund shall also receive all revenues 
from the sale or lease of trust property and any rental income generated from properties in the 
custody of the trust. 
(d) Money in the trust fund shall be available for expenditure by the trust for the 
attainable housing purposes set forth in this act without the need for further appropriation by 
town meeting. 
(e) By a 2/3 vote, the town may borrow money in aid of the trust, in accordance with 
chapter 44, to be used by the trust for any capital related purpose consistent with this act and for 
which the town is authorized to borrow. 

of 9 51  (f) Funds appropriated or dedicated by the town to the Affordable Housing Trust Fund for 
the creation of affordable housing prior to the effective date of this act shall remain in in the 
Affordable Housing Trust Fund, which shall be maintained by the Town as a separate account 
and expended for affordable housing purposes authorized by section 55C of chapter 44 of the 
General Laws. 
SECTION 4. (a) The trust, by and through its board of trustees, may: 
(i) accept and receive real property, personal property or money, by gift, grant, 
contribution, devise or transfer from any person, firm, corporation or other public or private 
entity, including but not limited to money, grants of funds or other property tendered to the trust 
in connection with any ordinance or by-law or any general or special law or any other source, 
including money from chapter 44B; provided, however, that any such money received from 
chapter 44B shall be used exclusively for community housing, as defined in said chapter 44B or 
any special law relating thereto, and shall remain subject to all the rules, regulations and 
limitations of that chapter when expended by the trust, and such funds shall be accounted for 
separately by the trust; and provided further, that at the end of each fiscal year, the trust shall 
ensure that all expenditures of funds received from said chapter 44B are reported to the 
community preservation committee of the town for inclusion in the community preservation 
initiatives report, form CP–3, to the department of revenue; 
(ii) purchase and retain real or personal property, including, but not limited to, 
investments that yield a high rate of income or no income; 
(iii) sell, lease, exchange, transfer or convey personal, mixed or real property at public 
auction or by private contract for such consideration and on such terms, and to make such 

of 9 73 contracts and enter into such undertakings relative to trust property as the board deems advisable 
notwithstanding the length of any such lease or contract; 
(iv) execute, acknowledge, and deliver deeds, assignments, transfers, pledges, leases, 
covenants, contracts, promissory notes, releases and other instruments sealed or unsealed, 
necessary, proper or incident to a transaction in which the board engages for the accomplishment 
of the purposes of the trust; 
(v) employ advisors and agents, such as accountants, appraisers, design and housing 
development professionals, and lawyers, as the board deems necessary; 
(vi) pay reasonable compensation and expenses to all such advisors and agents and to 
apportion such compensation between income and principal as the board deems advisable; 
(vii) apportion receipts and charges between income and principal as the board deems 
advisable, amortize premiums and establish sinking funds for such purpose and create reserves 
for depreciation depletion or otherwise; 
(viii) participate in reorganization, recapitalization, merger or similar transactions, give 
proxies or powers of attorney with or without power of substitution to vote any securities or 
certificates of interest and consent to a contract, lease, mortgage, purchase or sale of property, by 
or between a corporation and another corporation or person; 
(ix) deposit any security with a protective reorganization committee and delegate to that 
committee such powers and authority with relation thereto as the board may deem proper and 
pay, out of trust property, the portion of expenses and compensation of such committee as the 
board may deem necessary and appropriate; 

of 9 94  (x) carry property for accounting purposes other than acquisition date values; 
(xi) borrow money on such terms and conditions and from such sources as the board 
deems advisable, and mortgage and pledge trust assets as collateral; 
(xii) make distributions or divisions of principal in kind; 
(xiii) comprise, attribute, defend, enforce, release, settle or otherwise adjust claims in 
favor or against the trust, including claims for taxes, accept any property, either in total or partial 
100 satisfaction of any indebtedness or other obligation and, subject to this act, continue to hold the 
101 same for such period of time as the board may deem appropriate; 
102  (xiv) manage or improve real property and abandon any property which the board 
103 determines is not worth retaining; 
104  (xv) hold all or part of the trust property uninvested for 
105  such purposes and for such time as the board may deem 
106  appropriate; and 
107  (xvi) extend the time for payment of any obligation to the trust. 
108  (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all moneys paid to the 
109 trust in accordance with any zoning by-law, exaction fee, or private contributions shall be paid 
110 directly into the trust and need not be appropriated or accepted and approved into the trust. 
111 General revenues appropriated into the trust become trust property and may be expended without 
112 further appropriation. All money remaining in the trust at the end of a fiscal year, whether or not 

of 9 113 expended by the board within 1 year of the date the money was appropriated into the trust, shall 
114 remain trust property. 
115  (c) The trust is a public employer, and the members of the board are municipal employees 
116 for the purposes of chapter 258 of the General Laws. 
117  (d) The trust shall be deemed a municipal agency and the trustees special municipal 
118 employees, for the purposes of· chapter 268A of the General Laws. 
119  (e) The trust is exempt from chapters 59 and 62 of the General Laws, and from any other 
120 General Law concerning payment of taxes based upon or measured by property or income 
121 imposed by the commonwealth or a political subdivision of the Commonwealth. 
122  (f) The books and records of the trust shall be audited annually by an independent auditor 
123 in accordance with generally accepted accounting practices. 
124  (g) The trust is a public body for the purposes of sections 18 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 
125 30A of the General Laws. 
126  (h) The trust is a board of the town for the purposes of chapters 30B and section 15A of 
127 chapter 40 of the General Laws; provided, however, that agreements and conveyances between 
128 the trust and agencies, boards, commissions, authorities, departments, and public 
129 instrumentalities of the town shall be exempt from said chapter 30B. 
130  (i) The trust may procure insurance against loss in connection with its properties and 
131 other assets and operations in such amount and from such insurers as it deems desirable. 
132  (j) The trust may act and do things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers 
133 expressly granted in this act or in any by-law consistent with this act enacted by the town. 

of 9 134  (k) The board of trustees shall be considered a town board subject to the charter and by-
135 laws of the town except as may be otherwise expressly provided in this act. 
136  (l) The board of trustees may, further, exercise all of the powers and duties vested in 
137 municipal affordable housing trust boards of trustees by section 55C of chapter 44 of the General 
138 Laws, as amended from time to time. 
139  SECTION 5. The financial records of the trust shall be subject to control and oversight by 
140 the town's finance department and subject to yearly audits by the accounting firm employed by 
141 the town for the purposes of the regular town audit. 
142  SECTION 6. Attainable housing units created by the trust or financed in whole, or in 
143 part, with trust funds shall, to the maximum extent allowed by law, be offered to: 
144  (i) current year-round residents of the Town of Chatham; 
145  (ii) municipal employees; 
146  (iii) employees of local businesses; and 
147  (iv) households with children attending schools in the town of Chatham who comply with 
148 the attainable housing income eligibility limit of 200 per cent of the area median household 
149 income as most recently determined by the United State Department of Housing and Urban 
150 Development, adjusted for household size. The trust may enact regulations establishing 
151 additional preference criteria based on income eligibility and/or alternative or additional 
152 definitions for "attainable housing". 

of 9 153  SECTION 6A. Affordable housing units created by the trust or financed in whole, or in 
154 part, with Affordable Housing Trust funds shall, to the maximum extent allowed by law, be 
155 offered to: 
156  (i) current year-round residents of the Town of Chatham; 
157  (ii) municipal employees; 
158  (iii) employees of local businesses; and 
159  (iv) households with children attending schools in the town of Chatham who comply with 
160 the affordable housing income eligibility limit of 100 per cent of the area median household 
161 income as most recently determined by the United State Department of Housing and Urban 
162 Development, adjusted for household size. The trust may enact regulations establishing 
163 additional preference criteria based on income eligibility and/or alternative or additional 
164 definitions for "affordable housing." 
165  SECTION 7. This act, being necessary for the welfare of the Commonwealth and the 
166 Town of Chatham and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect its purpose. 
167  SECTION 8. This act shall take effect upon its passage.